California statutes. Civil Code
 chapter, and any other equitable considerations appropriate in the circumstances. Nothing in this chapter requires that, to be certified as a qualified third-party dispute resolution process pursuant to this section, decisions of the process must consider or provide remedies in the form of awards of punitive damages or multiple damages, under subdivision (c) of Section 1794, or of attorneys’ fees under subdivision (d) of Section 1794, or of consequential damages other than as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1794, including, but not limited to, reasonable repair, towing, and rental car costs actually incurred by the buyer.

(8) Requires that no arbitrator deciding a dispute may be a party to the dispute and that no other person, including an employee, agent, or dealer for the manufacturer, may be allowed to participate substantively in the merits of any dispute with the arbitrator unless the buyer is allowed to participate also.
 Nothing in this subdivision prohibits any member of an arbitration board from deciding a dispute.

(9) Obtains and maintains certification by the Department of Consumer Affairs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 472) of Division 1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(e) For the purposes of subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2 and this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Nonconformity” means a nonconformity which substantially impairs the use, value, or safety of the new motor vehicle to the buyer or lessee.

(2) “New motor vehicle” means a new motor vehicle that is bought or used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. “New motor vehicle” also means a new motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight under
 10,000 pounds that is bought or used primarily for business purposes by a person, including a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, or any other legal entity, to which not more than five motor vehicles are registered in this state. “New motor vehicle” includes the chassis, chassis cab, and that portion of a motor home devoted to its propulsion, but does not include any portion designed, used, or maintained primarily for human habitation, a dealer-owned vehicle and a “demonstrator” or other motor vehicle sold with a manufacturer’s new car warranty but does not include a motorcycle or a motor vehicle which is not registered under the Vehicle Code because it is to be operated or used exclusively off the highways. A demonstrator is a vehicle assigned by a dealer for the purpose of demonstrating qualities and characteristics common to vehicles of the same or similar model and type.

(3) “Motor home” means a vehicular unit
 built on, or permanently attached to, a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis, chassis cab, or van, which becomes an integral part of the completed vehicle, designed for human habitation for recreational or emergency occupancy.

(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no person shall sell, either at wholesale or retail, lease, or transfer a motor vehicle transferred by a buyer or lessee to a manufacturer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2 or a similar statute of any other state, unless the nature of the nonconformity experienced by the original buyer or lessee is clearly and conspicuously disclosed to the prospective buyer, lessee, or transferee, the nonconformity is corrected, and the manufacturer warrants to the new buyer, lessee, or transferee in writing for a period of one year that the motor vehicle is free of that nonconformity.

(2) Except for the requirement that the nature of the nonconformity be disclosed to the transferee, paragraph (1) does not apply to the transfer of a motor vehicle to an educational institution if the purpose of the transfer is to make the motor vehicle available for use in automotive repair courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.23.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That the expansion of state warranty laws covering new and used cars has given important and valuable protection to consumers.

(2) That, in states without this valuable warranty protection, used and irrepairable motor vehicles are being resold in the marketplace without notice to the subsequent purchaser.

(3) That other states have addressed this problem by requiring notices on the title of these vehicles or other notice procedures to warn consumers that the motor vehicles were repurchased by a dealer or manufacturer because the vehicle could not be repaired in a reasonable length of time or a reasonable number of repair attempts or the dealer or manufacturer was not willing to repair the vehicle.

(4) That these notices serve the interests of consumers who have a right to information relevant to their buying decisions.

(5) That the disappearance of these notices upon the transfer of title from another state to this state encourages the transport of “lemons” to this state for sale to the drivers of this state.

(b) This section and Section 1793.24 shall be
 known, and may be cited as, the Automotive Consumer Notification Act.

(c) Any manufacturer who reacquires or assists a dealer or lienholder to reacquire a motor vehicle registered in this state, any other state, or a federally administered district shall, prior to any sale, lease, or transfer of the vehicle in this state, or prior to exporting the vehicle to another state for sale, lease, or transfer if the vehicle was registered in this state and reacquired pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2, cause the vehicle to be retitled in the name of the manufacturer, request the Department of Motor Vehicles to inscribe the ownership certificate with the notation “Lemon Law Buyback,” and affix a decal to the vehicle in accordance with Section 11713.12 of the Vehicle Code if the manufacturer knew or should have known that the vehicle is required by law to be replaced, accepted for restitution due to the failure of the
 manufacturer to conform the vehicle to applicable warranties pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2, or accepted for restitution by the manufacturer due to the failure of the manufacturer to conform the vehicle to warranties required by any other applicable law of the state, any other state, or federal law.

(d) Any manufacturer who reacquires or assists a dealer or lienholder to reacquire a motor vehicle in response to a request by the buyer or lessee that the vehicle be either replaced or accepted for restitution because the vehicle did not conform to express warranties shall, prior to the sale, lease, or other transfer of the vehicle, execute and deliver to the subsequent transferee a notice and obtain the transferee’s written acknowledgment of a notice, as prescribed by Section 1793.24.

(e) Any person, including any dealer, who acquires a motor vehicle
 for resale and knows or should have known that the vehicle was reacquired by the vehicle’s manufacturer in response to a request by the last retail owner or lessee of the vehicle that it be replaced or accepted for restitution because the vehicle did not conform to express warranties shall, prior to the sale, lease, or other transfer, execute and deliver to the subsequent transferee a notice and obtain the transferee’s written acknowledgment of a notice, as prescribed by Section 1793.24.

(f) Any person, including any manufacturer or dealer, who sells, leases, or transfers ownership of a motor vehicle when the vehicle’s ownership certificate is inscribed with the notation “Lemon Law Buyback” shall, prior to the sale, lease, or ownership transfer of the vehicle, provide the transferee with a disclosure statement signed by the transferee that states:
“THIS VEHICLE WAS REPURCHASED BY ITS MANUFACTURER DUE TO A DEFECT IN THE VEHICLE PURSUANT TO
 CONSUMER WARRANTY LAWS. THE TITLE TO THIS VEHICLE HAS BEEN PERMANENTLY BRANDED WITH THE NOTATION ‛LEMON LAW BUYBACK’.”

(g) The disclosure requirements in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) are cumulative with all other consumer notice requirements and do not relieve any person, including any dealer or manufacturer, from complying with any other applicable law, including any requirement of subdivision (f) of Section 1793.22.

(h) For purposes of this section, “dealer” means any person engaged in the business of selling, offering for sale, or negotiating the retail sale of, a used motor vehicle or selling motor vehicles as a broker or agent for another, including the officers, agents, and employees of the person and any combination or association of dealers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 932, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.24.

(a) The notice required in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 1793.23 shall be prepared by the manufacturer of the reacquired vehicle and shall disclose all of the following:

(1) Year, make, model, and vehicle identification number of the vehicle.

(2) Whether the title to the vehicle has been inscribed with the notation “Lemon Law Buyback.”

(3) The nature of each nonconformity reported by the original buyer or lessee of the vehicle.

(4) Repairs, if any, made to the vehicle in an attempt to correct each nonconformity reported by the original buyer or lessee.

(b) The notice shall be on a form 812 x 11 inches in size and printed in no smaller than 10-point black type on a white background.

The form shall only contain the following information prior to it being filled out by the manufacturer:

WARRANTY BUYBACK NOTICE

(Check One)

□ This vehicle was repurchased by the vehicle’s manufacturer after the last retail
 owner or lessee requested its repurchase due to the problem(s) listed below.

□THIS VEHICLE WAS REPURCHASED BY ITS MANUFACTURER DUE TO A DEFECT IN THE VEHICLE PURSUANT TO CONSUMER WARRANTY LAWS. THE TITLE TO THIS VEHICLE HAS BEEN PERMANENTLY BRANDED WITH THE NOTATION “LEMON LAW BUYBACK.” Under California law, the manufacturer must warrant to you, for a one year period, that the vehicle is free of the problem(s) listed below.V.I.N.YearMakeModelProblem(s) Reported by 
 Original OwnerRepairs Made, if any, to 
Correct Reported Problem(s)

Signature of ManufacturerDateSignature of Dealer(s)Date
 Signature of Retail Buyer or Lessee
Date(c) The manufacturer shall provide an executed copy of the notice to the manufacturer’s transferee. Each transferee, including a dealer, to whom the motor vehicle is transferred prior to its sale to a retail
 buyer or lessee shall be provided an executed copy of the notice by the previous transferor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 503, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.25.

(a) Notwithstanding Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the State Board of Equalization shall reimburse the manufacturer of a new motor vehicle for an amount equal to the sales tax or use tax which the manufacturer pays to or for the buyer or lessee when providing a replacement vehicle pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d)
 of Section 1793.2 or includes in making restitution to the buyer or lessee pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2, when the manufacturer provides satisfactory proof that it has complied with subdivision (c) of Section 1793.23, and satisfactory proof is provided for one of the following:

 (1) The retailer of the motor vehicle for which the manufacturer is making restitution has reported and paid the sales tax on the gross receipts from the sale of that motor vehicle.

(2) The buyer of the motor vehicle has paid the use tax on the sales price for the storage, use, or other consumption of that motor vehicle in this state.

(3) The lessee of the motor vehicle has paid the use tax on the rentals payable from the lease of that motor vehicle.

(b) The State Board of Equalization may adopt rules and regulations to carry out, facilitate compliance with, or prevent circumvention or evasion of, this section.

(c) This section shall not change the application of the sales and use tax to the gross receipts, the rentals payable, and the sales price from the sale, lease, and the storage, use, or other consumption, in this state of tangible personal property pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(d) The manufacturer’s claim for reimbursement and the State Board of Equalization’s approval or denial of the claim shall be subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6901) of Chapter 7 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, except Sections 6907 and 6908, insofar as those
 provisions are not inconsistent with this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, the amount of use tax that the State Board of Equalization is required to reimburse the manufacturer shall be limited to the amount of use tax the manufacturer is required to pay to or for the lessee pursuant to Section 1793.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 2.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.26.

(a) Any automobile manufacturer, importer, distributor, dealer, or lienholder who reacquires, or who assists in reacquiring, a motor vehicle, whether by judgment, decree, arbitration award, settlement agreement, or voluntary agreement, is prohibited from doing either of the following:

(1) Requiring, as a condition of the reacquisition of the motor vehicle, that a buyer or lessee who is a resident of this state agree not to disclose the problems with the vehicle
 experienced by the buyer or lessee or the nonfinancial terms of the reacquisition.

(2) Including, in any release or other agreement, whether prepared by the manufacturer, importer, distributor, dealer, or lienholder, for signature by the buyer or lessee, a confidentiality clause, gag clause, or similar clause prohibiting the buyer or lessee from disclosing information to anyone about the problems with the vehicle, or the nonfinancial terms of the reacquisition of the vehicle by the manufacturer, importer, distributor, dealer, or lienholder.

(b) Any confidentiality clause, gag clause, or similar clause in such a release or other agreement in violation of this section shall be null and void as against the public policy of this state.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to prevent any confidentiality clause, gag
 clause, or similar clause regarding the financial terms of the reacquisition of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.3.

If the manufacturer of consumer goods sold in this state for which the manufacturer has made an express warranty does not provide service and repair facilities within this state pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1793.2, or does not make available to authorized service and repair facilities service literature and replacement parts sufficient to effect repair during the express warranty period, the buyer of such manufacturer’s nonconforming goods may follow the course of action prescribed in either subdivision (a), (b), or (c), below, as follows:

(a) Return the nonconforming
 consumer goods to the retail seller thereof. The retail seller shall do one of the following:

(1) Service or repair the nonconforming goods to conform to the applicable warranty.

(2) Direct the buyer to a reasonably close independent repair or service facility willing to accept service or repair under this section.

(3) Replace the nonconforming goods with goods that are identical or reasonably equivalent to the warranted goods.

(4) Refund to the buyer the original purchase price less that amount directly attributable to use by the buyer prior to the discovery of the nonconformity.

(b) Return the nonconforming consumer goods to any retail seller of like goods of the same manufacturer within
 this state who may do one of the following:

(1) Service or repair the nonconforming goods to conform to the applicable warranty.

(2) Direct the buyer to a reasonably close independent repair or service facility willing to accept service or repair under this section.

(3) Replace the nonconforming goods with goods that are identical or reasonably equivalent to the warranted goods.

(4) Refund to the buyer the original purchase price less that amount directly attributable to use by the buyer prior to the discovery of the nonconformity. 

(c) Secure the services of an independent repair or service facility for the service or repair of the nonconforming consumer goods, when service or repair of
 the goods can be economically accomplished. In that event the manufacturer shall be liable to the buyer, or to the independent repair or service facility upon an assignment of the buyer’s rights, for the actual and reasonable cost of service and repair, including any cost for parts and any reasonable cost of transporting the goods or parts, plus a reasonable profit. It shall be a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence that the reasonable cost of service or repair is an amount equal to that which is charged by the independent service dealer for like services or repairs rendered to service or repair customers who are not entitled to warranty protection. Any waiver of the liability of a manufacturer shall be void and unenforceable.

The course of action prescribed in this subdivision shall be available to the buyer only after the buyer has followed the course of action prescribed in either subdivision (a) or (b) and such course of action has
 not furnished the buyer with appropriate relief. In no event, shall the provisions of this subdivision be available to the buyer with regard to consumer goods with a wholesale price to the retailer of less than fifty dollars ($50). In no event shall the buyer be responsible or liable for service or repair costs charged by the independent repair or service facility which accepts service or repair of nonconforming consumer goods under this section. Such independent repair or service facility shall only be authorized to hold the manufacturer liable for such costs.

(d) A retail seller to which any nonconforming consumer good is returned pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall have the option of providing service or repair itself or directing the buyer to a reasonably close independent repair or service facility willing to accept service or repair under this section. In the event the retail seller directs the buyer to an independent repair or
 service facility, the manufacturer shall be liable for the reasonable cost of repair services in the manner provided in subdivision (c).

(e) In the event a buyer is unable to return nonconforming goods to the retailer due to reasons of size and weight, or method of attachment, or method of installation, or nature of the nonconformity, the buyer shall give notice of the nonconformity to the retailer. Upon receipt of such notice of nonconformity the retailer shall, at its option, service or repair the goods at the buyer’s residence, or pick up the goods for service or repair, or arrange for transporting the goods to its place of business. The reasonable costs of transporting the goods shall be at the retailer’s expense. The retailer shall be entitled to recover all such reasonable costs of transportation from the manufacturer pursuant to Section 1793.5. The reasonable costs of transporting nonconforming goods after delivery to the retailer until
 return of the goods to the buyer, when incurred by a retailer, shall be recoverable from the manufacturer pursuant to Section 1793.5. Written notice of nonconformity to the retailer shall constitute return of the goods for the purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b).

(f) The manufacturer of consumer goods with a wholesale price to the retailer of fifty dollars ($50) or more for which the manufacturer has made express warranties shall provide written notice to the buyer of the courses of action available to him under subdivision (a), (b), or (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 547, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.35.

(a) Where the retail sale of clothing or consumables is accompanied by an express warranty and such items do not conform with the terms of the express warranty, the buyer thereof may return the goods within 30 days of purchase or the period specified in the warranty, whichever is greater. The manufacturer may, in the express warranty, direct the purchaser to return nonconforming goods to a retail seller of like goods of the same manufacturer for replacement.

(b) When clothing or consumables are returned to a retail seller for the reason that they do not conform to an express
 warranty, the retailer shall replace the nonconforming goods where the manufacturer has directed replacement in the express warranty. In the event the manufacturer has not directed replacement in the express warranty, the retailer may replace the nonconforming goods or reimburse the buyer in an amount equal to the purchase price paid by the buyer for the goods, at the option of the retailer. Costs of reimbursement or replacement are recoverable by a retailer from the manufacturer in the manner provided in Section 1793.5.

(c) Where the retail sale of draperies is not accompanied by an express warranty and the sale of such draperies is accompanied by a conspicuous writing disclaiming the retailer’s implied warranty of merchantability on the fabric, the retailer’s implied warranty of merchantability shall not apply to the fabric.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.4.

Where an option is exercised in favor of service and repair under Section 1793.3, such service and repair must be commenced within a reasonable time, and, unless the buyer agrees in writing to the contrary, goods conforming to the applicable express warranties shall be tendered within 30 days. Delay caused by conditions beyond the control of the retail seller or his representative shall serve to extend this 30-day requirement. Where such a delay arises, conforming goods shall be tendered as soon as possible following termination of the condition giving rise to the delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.5.

Every manufacturer making express warranties who does not provide service and repair facilities within this state pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1793.2 shall be liable as prescribed in this section to every retail seller of such manufacturer’s goods who incurs obligations in giving effect to the express warranties that accompany such manufacturer’s consumer goods. The amount of such liability shall be determined as follows:

(a) In the event of replacement, in an amount equal to the actual cost to the retail seller of the replaced goods, and cost of transporting the goods, if such costs are
 incurred plus a reasonable handling charge.

(b) In the event of service and repair, in an amount equal to that which would be received by the retail seller for like service rendered to retail consumers who are not entitled to warranty protection, including actual and reasonable costs of the service and repair and the cost of transporting the goods, if such costs are incurred, plus a reasonable profit.

(c) In the event of reimbursement under subdivision (a) of Section 1793.3, in an amount equal to that reimbursed to the buyer, plus a reasonable handling charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1523.)
-------------------------------------------

1793.6.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a warranty service contract, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1793.2, entered into between a manufacturer and an independent service and repair facility, every manufacturer making express warranties whose consumer goods are sold in this state shall be liable as prescribed in this section to every independent serviceman who performs services or incurs obligations in giving effect to the express warranties that accompany such manufacturer’s consumer goods whether the independent serviceman is acting as an authorized service and repair facility designated by the manufacturer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 1793.2 or is acting as an independent serviceman pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 1793.3. The amount of such liability shall be an amount equal to the actual and reasonable costs of the service and repair, including any cost for parts and any reasonable cost of transporting the goods or parts, plus a reasonable profit. It shall be a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence that the reasonable cost of service or repair is an amount equal to that which is charged by the independent serviceman for like services or repairs rendered to service or repair customers who are not entitled to warranty protection. Any waiver of the liability of a manufacturer shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.

(a) Any buyer of consumer goods who is damaged by a failure to comply with any obligation under this chapter or under an implied or express warranty or service contract may bring an action for the recovery of damages and other legal and equitable relief.

(b) The measure of the buyer’s damages in an action under this section shall include the rights of replacement or reimbursement as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2, and the following:

(1) Where the buyer has rightfully rejected or justifiably revoked acceptance of the goods or has exercised any right to cancel the sale, Sections 2711, 2712, and 2713 of the Commercial Code shall apply.

(2) Where the buyer has accepted the goods, Sections 2714 and 2715 of the Commercial Code shall apply, and the measure of damages shall include the cost of repairs necessary to make the goods conform.

(c) If the buyer establishes that the failure to comply was willful, the judgment may include, in addition to the amounts recovered under subdivision (a), a civil penalty which shall not exceed two times the amount of actual damages. This subdivision shall not apply in any class action under Section 382 of the Code of Civil Procedure or under Section 1781, or with respect to a claim based solely on a breach of an implied
 warranty.

(d) If the buyer prevails in an action under this section, the buyer shall be allowed by the court to recover as part of the judgment a sum equal to the aggregate amount of costs and expenses, including attorney’s fees based on actual time expended, determined by the court to have been reasonably incurred by the buyer in connection with the commencement and prosecution of such action.

(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if the buyer establishes a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2, the buyer shall recover damages and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, and may recover a civil penalty of up to two times the amount of damages.

(2) If the manufacturer maintains a qualified third-party dispute resolution process which substantially
 complies with Section 1793.22, the manufacturer shall not be liable for any civil penalty pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) After the occurrence of the events giving rise to the presumption established in subdivision (b) of Section 1793.22, the buyer may serve upon the manufacturer a written notice requesting that the manufacturer comply with paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2. If the buyer fails to serve the notice, the manufacturer shall not be liable for a civil penalty pursuant to this subdivision.

(4) If the buyer serves the notice described in paragraph (3) and the manufacturer complies with paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1793.2 within 30 days of the service of that notice, the manufacturer shall not be liable for a civil penalty pursuant to this subdivision.

(5) If the buyer
 recovers a civil penalty under subdivision (c), the buyer may not also recover a civil penalty under this subdivision for the same violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1232, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.1.

(a) Any retail seller of consumer goods injured by the willful or repeated violation of the provisions of this chapter may bring an action for the recovery of damages. Judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed plus reasonable attorney fees.

(b) Any independent serviceman of consumer goods injured by the willful or repeated violation of the provisions of this chapter may bring an action for the recovery of damages. Judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed plus reasonable attorney
 fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.3.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any defect or nonconformity in consumer goods caused by the unauthorized or unreasonable use of the goods following sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1523.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.4.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the sale of a service contract to the buyer in addition to or in lieu of an express warranty if that contract fully and conspicuously discloses in simple and readily understood language the terms, conditions, and exclusions of that contract, provided that nothing in this section shall apply to a home protection contract issued by a home protection company that is subject to Part 7 (commencing with Section 12740) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided in the service contract, every service contract shall obligate the service contractor to
 provide to the buyer of the product all of the services and functional parts that may be necessary to maintain proper operation of the entire product under normal operation and service for the duration of the service contract and without additional charge.

(c) The service contract shall contain all of the following items of information:

(1) If the service contract covers a single product, a clear description and identification of the covered product. If the service contract covers a class of products, a description of the class of products covered by the service contract that is sufficiently clear so the buyer is able to discern the products covered.

(2) The point in time or event when the term of the service contract
 commences, and its duration measured by elapsed time or an objective measure of use.

(3) (A) A service contract may be offered on a month-to-month or other periodic basis and continue until canceled by the buyer or the service contractor in accordance with Section 1794.41 and, for electronic and appliance repair dealers, Section 9855.6 of the Business and Professions Code. If the service contract continues until canceled by the buyer or service contractor, the service contract shall do all of the following:

(i) Disclose to the buyer in a clear and conspicuous manner that the service contract shall continue until canceled by the buyer or service contractor and require the buyer’s affirmative consent to this provision.

(ii) Disclose to the buyer all alternatives that the seller offering the service contract offers, including any fixed-term service contracts or other service contract basis that does not continue until it is canceled.

(iii) Provide, at a minimum, a toll-free number, email address, postal address, and, if one exists, internet website the buyer can use to cancel the service contract. Cancellation shall not require the use of more than one of these methods to be completed and shall be effective immediately upon receipt of the request for cancellation.

(iv) If the service contract was entered into online, allow the buyer the option to cancel the service contract exclusively online, without engaging in any unnecessary steps that obstruct or delay the buyer’s ability to
 cancel the continuation of the service contract. 

(v) (I) Provide for a refund to the buyer of any unearned amounts in accordance with Section 1794.41 and, for electronic and appliance repair dealers, Section 9855.6 of the Business and Professions Code.

(II) The amount of any refund, as well as any cancellation or administrative fees, under this paragraph shall be calculated based on the period, whether month to month or otherwise, for which payment is made and the amount of the payment for the period.

(III) A written notice of cancellation other than notice required by clauses (iii) and (iv) shall not be required to obtain a refund.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to vehicle service contracts.

(4) If the enforceability of the service contract is limited to the original buyer or is limited to persons other than every consumer owner of the covered product during the term of the service contract, a description of the limits on transfer or assignment of the service contract.

(5) A statement of the general obligation of the service contractor in the same language set forth in subdivision (b), with equally clear and conspicuous statements of the following:

(A) Any services, parts, characteristics, components, properties, defects, malfunctions, causes, conditions,
 repairs, or remedies that are excluded from the scope of the service contract.

(B) Any other limits on the application of the language in subdivision (b) such as a limit on the total number of service calls.

(C) Any additional services that the service contractor will provide.

(D) Whether the obligation of the service contractor includes preventive maintenance and, if so, the nature and frequency of the preventive maintenance that the service contractor will provide.

(E) Whether the buyer has an obligation to provide preventive maintenance or perform any other obligations and, if so, the nature and frequency of the preventive maintenance and of any other obligations,
 and the consequences of any noncompliance.

(6) A step-by-step explanation of the procedure that the buyer should follow in order to obtain performance of any obligation under the service contract including the following:

(A) The full legal and business name of the service contractor.

(B) The mailing address of the service contractor.

(C) The persons or class of persons that are authorized to perform service.

(D) The name or title and address of any agent, employee, or department of the service contractor that is responsible for the performance of any obligations.

(E) The method of giving notice to the service contractor of the need for service.

(F) Whether in-home service is provided or, if not, whether the costs of transporting the product for service or repairs will be paid by the service contractor.

(G) If the product must be transported to the service contractor, either the place where the product may be delivered for service or repairs or a toll-free telephone number that the buyer may call to obtain that information.

(H) All other steps that the buyer must take to obtain service.

(I) All fees, charges, and other costs that the buyer must pay to obtain service.

(7) An explanation of the steps that the service contractor will take to carry out its obligations under the service contract.

(8) A description of any right to cancel the contract if the buyer returns the product or the product is sold, lost, stolen, or destroyed, or, if there is no right to cancel or the right to cancel is limited, a statement of the fact.

(9) Information respecting the availability of any informal dispute settlement process.

(d) A service contractor may cancel a service contract offered on a month-to-month or other periodic basis only if any of the following occurs:

(1) The buyer fails to make timely payment.

(2) The buyer is otherwise in material breach of the service contract.

(3) The buyer has committed fraud in connection with the service contract.

(4) (A) The service contractor or its affiliate is the obligor under the service contract, and the service contractor or its affiliate is discontinuing this category of service contract no later than 30 days after the effective date of the cancellation.

(B) A cancellation or administrative fee shall not be charged to the buyer for a cancellation pursuant to this paragraph.

(5) (A) Neither the seller offering the service
 contract nor any of its affiliates is the obligor under the service contract, and the seller is discontinuing its offering of the service contract no later than 30 days after the effective date of the cancellation in favor of a service contract with a different obligor.

(B) A cancellation or administrative fee shall not be charged to the buyer for a cancellation pursuant to this paragraph.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “Affiliate” means an entity that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another specified entity.

(2) (A) “Affirmative consent” means any freely
 given, specific, informed, and unambiguous indication of the consumer’s wishes by which the consumer, or the consumer’s legal guardian, a person who has power of attorney, or a person acting as a conservator for the consumer, including by a statement or by a clear affirmative action, signifies agreement to the continuous until canceled nature of the service contract.

(B) “Affirmative consent” does not mean any of the following:

(i) Acceptance of a general or broad terms of use, or similar document, that contains descriptions of the coverages under the service contract along with other, unrelated information.

(ii) Hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content.

(iii) Agreement obtained through the use of dark patterns. 

(f) Subdivisions (b) and (c) are applicable to service contracts on new or used home appliances and home electronic products entered into on or after July 1, 1989. They are applicable to service contracts on all other new or used products entered into on and after July 1, 1991.

(g) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision are applicable only to a service contract entered into
 on or after January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 452, Sec. 2.   (AB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.41.

(a) No service contract covering any motor vehicle, home appliance, or home electronic product purchased for use in this state may be offered for sale or sold unless all of the following elements exist:

(1) The contract shall contain the disclosures specified in Section 1794.4 and shall disclose in the manner described in that section
 the buyer’s cancellation and refund rights provided by this section.
